District of Columbia statutes.
31-4722

Industrial life policies — Required provisions.

(a)

No policy of industrial life insurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery in the District unless it contains in substance the following provisions, or provisions which in the opinion of the Commissioner are more favorable to the policyholders:

(1)

A provision that all premiums after the first shall be payable in advance, either at the home office of the company or to an agent of the company;

(2)

A provision that the insured is entitled to a grace period of at least 28 days within which the payment of any premiums after the first may be made, and during which period of grace the policy shall continue in full force, but in case the policy becomes a claim during the said period of grace before the overdue premium is paid, the amount of such premium may be deducted from any amount payable under the policy in settlement;

(3)

A provision that, except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the policy shall constitute the entire contract between the parties and shall be incontestable after it has been in force during the lifetime of the insured for a period of not more than 2 years from its date, except for nonpayment of premiums and except for violations of the conditions of the policy relating to naval or military service in time of war, and, at the option of the company, provisions relative to benefits in the event of total and permanent disability and provisions which grant additional insurance specifically against death by accident may also be excepted; if a copy of the application be attached to the policy, a provision that all statements made by the insured shall, in the absence of fraud, be deemed representations and not warranties, and that no such statement or statements shall be used in defense of a claim under the policy unless contained in the attached written application;

(4)

A provision that if it shall be found at any time before final settlement under the policy that the age of the insured (or the age of any other person considered in determining the premium) has been misstated, the amount payable under the policy shall be such as the premium would have purchased at the correct age, according to the company’s rate at date of issue;

(5)

If the policy is a participating policy, a provision indicating the conditions under which the company shall periodically ascertain and apportion any divisible surplus accruing to the policy;

(6)

A provision for nonforfeiture benefits and cash surrender values in accordance with the requirements of § 31-4705.01 or § 31-4705.02;

(7)

A provision specifying the options, if any, to which the policyholder is entitled in the event of default in a premium payment;

(8)

A provision that if in event of default in premium payments the value of the policy shall have been applied to the purchase of other insurance as provided for in this section, and if such insurance shall be in force and the original policy shall not have been surrendered to the company and cancelled, the policy may be reinstated within 2 years from such default, upon evidence of insurability satisfactory to the company and payment of arrears of premiums and the payment or reinstatement of any other indebtedness to the company upon said policy, with interest on said premium and indebtedness at the rate of not exceeding 6 per centum per annum payable annually;

(9)

A provision that when a policy shall become a claim by the death of the insured settlement shall be made upon receipt of due proof of death; and

(10)

Title on the face and on the back of the policy briefly describing its form.

(b)

Any of the foregoing provisions or portions thereof not applicable to single premium or nonparticipating or term policies shall, to that extent, not be incorporated therein; and any such policy may be issued or delivered in the District which in the opinion of the Commissioner contains provisions on any 1 or more of the several foregoing requirements more favorable to the policyholder than hereinbefore required. The provisions of this section shall not apply to policies issued or granted in exchange for lapsed or surrendered policies. Nothing contained in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this section shall apply to applications for reinstatement. A reinstated policy shall be contestable on account of fraud or misrepresentation of material facts pertaining to the reinstatement, for the same period after reinstatement as provided in the policy with respect to the original issue.

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 22
May 4, 1950, 64 Stat. 104, ch. 157, § 7
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(j), 44 DCR 1730
1981 Ed., § 35-528.
1973 Ed., § 35-723.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4701.